Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4607
General consideration in custody proceeding of parent's military service.

In a proceeding for custodial responsibility of a child of a service member, a court may not consider a parent's past deployment or possible future deployment in itself in determining the best interest of the child but may consider any significant impact on the best interest of the child of the parent's past or possible future deployment.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 7.